New York, session 2025-2026, A2592.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 26 of the correction law, as amended by chapter 322 2 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 26. [Establishment of commissaries] Commissaries or canteens in 4 correctional institutions. 1. The commissioner may authorize the head of 5 any institution in the department to establish a commissary or a canteen 6 in such institution for the use and benefit of incarcerated individuals. 7 Items sold at the commissary or canteen shall be sold at no more than 8 three percent over the purchase price for such items. The department 9 shall maximize discounts procured by bulk purchasing commissary items or 10 through other contracting opportunities that reduce the cost of such 11 items, and shall not receive commissions, revenue, or other financial 12 incentives in any contract with a seller, supplier, or vendor of commis- 13 sary items. The moneys received by the head of the institution as 14 profits from the sales of the commissary or canteen shall be deposited 15 in a special fund to be known as the commissary or canteen fund and such 16 funds shall be used for the general purposes of the institution subject 17 to the provisions of section fifty-three of the state finance law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01715-07-6 A. 2592--B 2 1 2. The department shall publish on its website the price lists for all 2 commissary items for sale at each institution as of June first, two 3 thousand twenty-six and on an annual basis thereafter. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.